Utah statutes.
77-10a-10.   Charge of grand jury -- Rights and duties.

Upon impanelment of each grand jury, the judge managing the grand jury shall charge the grand jury and inform it of:

(1)  its duty to inquire into offenses against the criminal laws alleged to have been committed within the jurisdiction;

(2)  its independent right to call and interrogate witnesses;

(3)  its right to request the production of documents or other evidence, including exculpatory evidence;

(4)  the necessity of finding credible evidence of each material element of any crime charged before returning an indictment;

(5)  the need to be satisfied that clear and convincing evidence exists that tends to show that a crime was committed by the person or persons accused before returning an indictment;

(6)  its right to have the prosecutor present it with draft indictments for less serious charges than those originally requested by the prosecutor;

(7)  the obligation of secrecy; and

(8)  other duties and rights as the court finds advisable.



Enacted by Chapter 318, 1990 General Session

